District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0707.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Rodent Education and Management Yields Results Amendment Act of
2026”.
Sec. 2. Subtitle B of the Rodent Control Act of 2000, effective February 2, 2001 (D.C. 37
Law 13-172; D.C. Official Code § 8-2103.01 et seq.), is amended as follows:
(a) Section 904 (D.C. Official Code § 8-2103.01) is amended by added a new paragraph
(1A) and (1B) to read as follows:
“(1A) “Anticoagulant rodenticide” means a pesticide product intended to kill a rat


or mouse that has a mode of action that interferes with blood clotting, including products with
Brodifacoum, Bromadiolone, Chlorophacinone, Difenacoum, Difethialone, Diphacinonon, or
Warfarin as active ingredients.
“(1B) “Bureau” means the Bureau of Rodent Control with the Department of
Health.”.
(b) New sections 909, 910, and 911 are added to read as follows:
“Sec. 909. Establishment of commercial corridor rodent-proof dumpster pilot grant
program.
“(a) The Bureau shall establish a pilot grant program to provide grants to install at least
10 rodent-proof dumpsters for businesses in commercial corridors with high rat populations.
“(b) To be eligible to participate in the pilot program, an applicant shall:
“(1) Be a Business Improvement District, Main Street, or private food-serving
business;
“(2) Be located in a commercial corridor where the Bureau has identified there to
be a high incidence of rodents; and
“(3) Demonstrate that current dumpsters are causing increased rodents in a
commercial corridor and have consent from a business to replace one or more current dumpsters
with rodent-proof dumpsters.
“(c) The Bureau shall monitor and evaluate the pilot program for a period of no less than
12 months following installation of the rodent-proof dumpsters and assess factors including:
“(A) Reduction in rodent activity and complaints in pilot areas;
“(B) Business compliance with proper use of rodent-proof dumpsters, including
adequate frequency of waste collection; and


“(C) Durability, maintenance requirements, and user satisfaction of different
dumpster designs, if grantees purchase different models.
“(d) Within 18 months of the pilot program’s commencement, the Department of Health
shall submit a report to the Council detailing the program’s findings, recommendations for
expanding the pilot program, and proposed specifications for standardized rodent-proof
dumpsters.
“Sec. 910. Rodenticide use restrictions.
“(a) It shall be unlawful for a person to use, sell, or otherwise distribute for use
anticoagulant rodenticides on public or private property; provided, that this section shall not
prohibit the purchase or use of anticoagulant rodenticides by:
“(1) A District or federal government agency acting within the scope of its official
duties;
“(2) A contractor acting on behalf of a local or federal government agency; or
“(3) A company or person certified to apply pesticides by the Department of
Energy and the Environment, when acting within the scope of that certification.
“(b) A person who violates subsection (a) of this section shall remove the anticoagulant
rodenticide within 7 days of notification of the violation from the Mayor. A person who fails to
remove the rodenticide or who receives more than 2 notifications of violations shall be subject to
civil fines, penalties, and fees consistent with section 908(d).
“(c) Anticoagulant rodenticide shall be considered restricted-use pesticide pursuant to
D.C. Code § 8–432.
“Sec. 911. Public education on rodent abatement.
“(a) The Bureau shall establish a public education program (“program”) to reduce rodent


populations, which shall include information on the following topics:
“(1) Effective rodent prevention strategies, including sanitation, habitat
modification, and biological control;
“(2) Evidence-based rodent abatement strategies, including available government
and community resources;
“(3) Safe practices for encountering rodents to minimize risk of disease
transmission; and
“(4) Public health risks to children, adults, pets, and wildlife of improper use of
rodenticides, including emergency response procedures when a human or pet has ingested
rodenticide.
“(b) The program may:
“(1) Distribute printed materials, including brochures, mailers, or door hangers;
“(2) Create digital content, including website resources, social medial, and
interactive tools;
“(3) Conduct in-person trainings and community events;
“(4) Take out bus and metro banners;
100 “(5) Conduct partnerships with community organizations, schools, faith-based
101 institutions, and business associations; and
102 “(6) Conduct direct outreach to high-priority parties, including food service
103 establishments, property managers and owners, landlords, event venues, and other parties near
104 areas with high rodent activity.”.
105 Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
106 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal


107 impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
108 approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
109 Sec. 4. Effective date.
110 This act shall take effect after approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
111 Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
112 as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
113 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).